dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- बिचरा; ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="/बिचरा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बिचरी</l>
          <r>बिचरा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बिचरा</l>
          <r>बिचरा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>विचरा</l>
          <r>बिचरा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निकट; निकट; 3 -->
    <pardef n="निकट__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>र</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनेजस्तो; भनेजस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनेजस्तो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यस्सो; यस्सो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यस्सो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोला; भोला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोला__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सालो; ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="/सालो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>काला</l>
          <r>सालो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- न्यून; न्यून; 3 -->
    <pardef n="न्यून__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तर</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सेतो; सेत; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सेत/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोत्ति; मोत्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोत्ति__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सानो; स; 8 -->
    <pardef n="स/ानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ानो</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ानी</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाना</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-साना</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>साना</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्याना</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाना-साना</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-सना</l>
          <r>ानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रित्तो; रित्त; 2 -->
    <pardef n="रित्त/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लामो; लाम; 3 -->
    <pardef n="लाम/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ालामा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फितलो; फितलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फितलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सारा; सारा; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सारा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिनो; तिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिन/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सशस्त्र; सशस्त्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सशस्त्र__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वटा; वटा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वटा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बूढो; बूढ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बूढ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जाखो; जाखो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जाखो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गाग्रो; गाग्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गाग्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुमार; कुमार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुमार__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कालो; काल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="काल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बन्द; बन्द; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बन्द__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मूल; मूल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मूल__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोको; भोक; 2 -->
    <pardef n="भोक/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काँचो; काँचो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काँचो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माहिलो; माहिल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="माहिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुब्लो; दुब्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुब्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सवै; सवै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सवै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वादिलो; स्वादिल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="स्वादिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="बिचरा"><i></i><par n="/बिचरा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निकट"><i>निकट</i><par n="निकट__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भनेजस्तो"><i>भनेजस्तो</i><par n="भनेजस्तो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्सो"><i>यस्सो</i><par n="यस्सो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भोला"><i>भोला</i><par n="भोला__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सालो"><i></i><par n="/सालो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="न्यून"><i>न्यून</i><par n="न्यून__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सेतो"><i>सेत</i><par n="सेत/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोत्ति"><i>मोत्ति</i><par n="मोत्ति__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सानो"><i>स</i><par n="स/ानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रित्तो"><i>रित्त</i><par n="रित्त/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लामो"><i>लाम</i><par n="लाम/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फितलो"><i>फितलो</i><par n="फितलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सारा"><i>सारा</i><par n="सारा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तिनो"><i>तिन</i><par n="तिन/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सशस्त्र"><i>सशस्त्र</i><par n="सशस्त्र__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वटा"><i>वटा</i><par n="वटा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूढो"><i>बूढ</i><par n="बूढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जाखो"><i>जाखो</i><par n="जाखो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गाग्रो"><i>गाग्रो</i><par n="गाग्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुमार"><i>कुमार</i><par n="कुमार__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कालो"><i>काल</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बन्द"><i>बन्द</i><par n="बन्द__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मूल"><i>मूल</i><par n="मूल__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भोको"><i>भोक</i><par n="भोक/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काँचो"><i>काँचो</i><par n="काँचो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माहिलो"><i>माहिल</i><par n="माहिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुब्लो"><i>दुब्लो</i><par n="दुब्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सवै"><i>सवै</i><par n="सवै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वादिलो"><i>स्वादिल</i><par n="स्वादिल/ो__adj"/></e>
